translate/lexd/adj.lexd
бе-илм:необразованный
бе-ингах̌т:беспалый
бе-инсоф:бессовестный
бе-йилм:необразованный
бе-кӯдак:бездетный
бе-мêр:жестокий
бе-мêр:отталкивающий
бе-обрӯй:бесстыдный
бе-пайсā:безденежный
бе-парwо:беспечный
бе-пид:без_отца
бе-пид:невоспитанный
бе-пӣр:бессовестный
бе-пӣр:не_имеющий_пира
бе-пӯл:неимущий
бе-рāм:безжалостный
бе-рӯй:наглый
бе-сāр:своевольный
бе-саwод:неграмотный
бе-саwот:неграмотный
бе-сабӯр-гулак:бесстыжий
бе-соwот:неграмотный
бе-тартӣб:беспорядочный
бе-толи:несчастный
бе-ух̌:без_памяти
бе-фарзанд:бездетный
бе-фирих̌тā:бесцеремонный
бе-фирих̌тā:бесцеремонный
бе-фирқā:беспартийный
бе-фойдā:бесполезный
бе-х̌ац:безводный
бе-х̌оҷ:бесстрашный
бе-х̌оҷ:бесстрашный
бе-хабар:неосведомленный
бе-хоб:без_сна
бе-хӯδм:бессонный
бе-хӯн:бескровный
бе-хӯн:бесстрашный
бе-чор:незамужняя
бе-ғалч:без_волнения
бе-ғалчаθ:без_волнения
бе-ғам:беззаботный
бе-ғулгāш:беззаботный
бе-қуwат:бессильный
бе-ҳасоб:бесчисленный
бе-ҷад:неправедный
бе-ҷой:без_места
бе-ҷу̊н:безжизненный
беwафо:неверный
беwахт:несвоевременный
беwаҷду̊н:бессовестный
беwилич:нетерпеливый
беwиҷду̊н:бессовестный
беwоситā:непосредственный
беwудā:бесполезный
беwуддā:бесполезный
беwух̌:без_памяти
беāд:безграничный
беāдоб:невежливый
беāмийат:несущественный
беāтибор:не_заслуживающий_доверия
беδуд:бездымный
беδуст:безрукий
беаwоз:беззвучный
беабри:безоблачный
беад:безграничный
беадаб:невежливый
беадад:бесчисленный
беадолат:несправедливый
беайб:безгрешный
беамдод:беззащитный
беамийат:несущественный
беандозā:безмерный
беаслиā:безоружный
беаслийā:безоружный
беасос:необоснованный
беатйот:неосторожный
бебāрā:не_дающий_плодов
бебирӯт:безусый
бебун:не_имеющий_донышка
бебун:не_имеющий_корня
бегизоф:безвредный
бегизоф:здоровый
бегиму̊н:несомненный
бегимӯн:несомненный
бегузоф:безвредный
бегузоф:здоровый
бегуму̊н:несомненный
бегумӯн:несомненный
бедарак:напрасный
бедарак:безвестный
бедастā:без_ручки
бедор:бодрствующий
бедор-хоб:полусонный
беду̊нā:бессемянный
бедуқат:беззаботный
бедуққат:беззаботный
беетйот:неосторожный
безāрā:несмелый
безабу̊н:бессловесный
безалал:безвредный
безамӣн:безземельный
безеб:некрасивый
безеб:некрасивый
безеб-рāнг:плоховатый
безен:непонятливый
безийу̊н:безвредный
безор:избегающий
беибо:смелый
беиллат:безупречный
беилм:неграмотный
беилоҷ:безвыходный
беимдод:беззащитный
беимзо:анонимный
беинсоф:бессовестный
беистедод:неспособный
бейибо:смелый
бейилм:неграмотный
бейобрӯй:бессовестный
бекаллā:безголовый
бекамар:без_ремня
бекамар:тощий
бекамбӯд:безупречный
беканор:безграничный
бекас:одинокий
бекор:ненужный
бекор:свободный
бекор:свободный
бекорā:бесполезный
бекорā:свободный
бекорā:бездельный
бекӣн:незлопамятный
бекӯдак:бездетный
белазат:безвкусный
белайоқат:неспособный
белизат:безвкусный
белиззат:безвкусный
белийоқат:неспособный
бемāйор:несвоевременный
бемāнай:бессмысленный
бемāнай:глупый
бемāно:бессмысленный
бемāнӣ:бессмысленный
бемāнӣ:глупый
бемаwрид:несвоевременный
бемаwқе:неуместный
бемаал:несвоевременный
бемаданийат:некультурный
бемадор:слабый
бемазā:безвкусный
бемазā:бесполезный
бемазā:безвкусный
бемазмӯн:бессодержательный
бемаку̊н:бесприютный
бемаму̊нийат:беспрепятственный
беманфийат:бесполезный
бемасӯлийат:безответственный
бемақсад:бесцельный
бемаҳал:несвоевременный
бемаҷол:бессильный
бемизā:безвкусный
бемизā:бесполезный
бемисл:бесподобный
бемисли:бесподобный
бемор:больной
бемор:больной
бемузд:бесплатный
бемунфат:бесполезный
бенāф:невыгодный
бенаwбат:внеочередной
бенамак:непривлекательный
бенамак:несоленый
бенасли:бездетный
бенатӣҷā:безрезультатный
бенафас:невезучий
бенико:невенчанный
беномӯс:бесчестный
бенубат:внеочередной
бенухтā:не_имеющий_недоуздка
бенухтā:необузданный
бенӯр:невидящий
бенӯр:некрасивый
бенӯр:тусклый
беоб:бессовестный
беобрӯй:бессовестный
беодам:безлюдный
беодоб:невежливый
беол:слабый
беол:ослабевший
беор:бесстыдный
беосил:неурожайный
беохир:бесконечный
бепадар:невоспитанный
бепайсā:безденежный
бепарwо:беспечный
бепарδā:беззастенчивый
бепарδā:беззастенчивый
бепилāн:бесплановый
бепоδ:безногий
бепох̌нā:без_каблука
бепу̊ст:без_кожи
бепу̊стаθ:без_кожи
бепӯл:безденежный
бепӯл:бесплатный
бераwах̌:неудобный
бераwу̊н:безвредный
бераот:неудобный
бераот:неудобный
бераҳот:неудобный
бераҳот:неудобный
бериот:неудобный
бериҳот:неудобный
беруот:неудобный
беруот:неудобный
беруҳот:неудобный
беруҳот:неудобный
берӯй:наглый
берӯй:смелый
бесāwод:неграмотный
бесāйиб:без_хозяина
бесāйиби:без_хозяина
бесāйиби:проклятый
бесāму̊н:беспорядочный
бесāр:не_имеющий_конца
бесāр:своевольный
бесаwоб:неудобный
бесаwоб:неудобный
бесабаб:беспричинный
бесабри:нетерпеливый
бесабӯр-гулак:бесстыжий
бесалêқā:неспособный
бесамар:бесплодный
бесамар:торопливый
бесамар:неудачливый
бесатри:бесстыжая
бесатри:бесстыжая
бесилêқā:неспособный
бесирих̌тā:не_имеющий_запасов
бесирих̌тā:недальновидный
бесоwод:неграмотный
бесоwот:неграмотный
бесойиб:без_хозяина
бесойиби:без_хозяина
бесойиби:проклятый
бесому̊н:беспорядочный
бетāмул:необдуманный
бетāғӣр:неизменный
бетааммул:необдуманный
бетаамул:необдуманный
бетажрибā:неопытный
беталмоли:проклятый
бетамӣз:безалаберный
бетараф:нейтральный
бетарбийā:невоспитанный
бетартӣб:беспорядочный
бетарӣн:наилучший
беташwӣш:спокойный
бетаҷрибā:неопытный
бетйот:неосторожный
бетоб:слабый
бетоли:несчастливый
беудā:бесполезный
бефарзанд:бездетный
бефаросат:несообразительный
бефикри:незадумывающийся
бефиросат:несообразительный
бефирқā:беспартийный
бефойдā:бесполезный
бех̌арм:бесстыдный
бехаwф:безопасный
бехабар:неосведомленный
бехатар:безопасный
бехато:безошибочный
бехех̌:безродный
бехилӣw:неожиданный
бехинӯр:озорной
бехинӯр:озорной
бечорā:беспомощный
бечорā:бесхитростный
бечорā:неимущий
бечорā:несчастный
бешараф:недостойный
бешумор:бесчисленный
беғам:беззаботный
беғараз:беспристрастный
беғараз:беспристрастный
беғубор:ясный
беғурбат:мирный
беқисӯр:здоровый
беқонӯн:незаконный
беқуwwат:бессильный
беқуwат:бессильный
беҳол:слабый
беҷад:неправедный
беҷо:неуместный
беҷой:неуместный
беҷу̊н:безжизненный
биwӣн:накрытый
биɣ̌ӣн:накрытый
биақл:неразумный
биақли:неразумный
бизург:великий
бизург:старший
бизург:священный
бийāбу̊н:такой
бийāбу̊ни:такой
бийих̌ти:райский
бийих̌ти:счастливый
бийобу̊н:такой
бийобу̊ни:такой
бийорну̊нҷ:вчерашний
бийорнӣнҷ:вчерашний
бийорӣнҷ:вчерашний
бийорӣнҷ:вчерашний
бийӣх̌ти:райский
бийӣх̌ти:счастливый
бикри:девственный
бикул:взрослый
билāн-қāд:рослый
билāн-қу̊мат:высокий
билāнд:высокий
билāнд:громкий
билāнд-пох̌нā:на_высоких_каблуках
билāнд-қāд:рослый
билāнд-қу̊мат:высокий
биланд:высокий
биланд:громкий
биланд:высокий
билғуч:комкообразный
билӯл:золотистый
билӯл:золотистый
бинйоти:непоколебимый
бирāнā:голый
бирзӣнин:бензиновый
бирзӣнин:брезентовый
бирик:тонкий
бирик:тонкий
бирик-нêӡ:остроносый
бирикик:тоненький
биринҷин:рисовый
биринҷин:бронзовый
биродари:братский
бирӡӣф:с_острыми_выступами
бирӡӣфак:с_острыми_выступами
бирӯтдор:имеющий_усы
бирӯтин:усатый
бисйор:многочисленный
бистари:постельный
бицди:меньший
бицди:младший
бицик:маленький
бицики:детский
бицикик:маленький
биғуз:стельная
биҷик:капризный
биҷӣзг:горелый
биҷӣск:горелый
биӡуғӡак:вспыльчивый
биӡуқ:торчащий
биӡӣɣ̌ӡак:плаксивый
биӡӣх̌:соленый
биӡӣх̌ов:солный
бо-саwод:грамотный
бобаги:дедовский
бобаракат:благодатный
бобарокат:благодатный
бобиги:дедовский
бобиги:дедовский
боди:ветряной
боди:чванливый
бодур:сильный
бози-пару̊н:взрослый
бозори:базарный
бозори:капризный
бозори:скандальный
бозоригари:базарный
бозоригари:капризный
болиғ:взрослый
боло-ху̊надор:имеющий_второй_этаж
болшаwӣки:большевистский
болшавӣки:большевистский
бомӯси:дородный
бори:весенний
бори:груженый
борик:тонкий
борик:тонкий
борикик:тоненький
бору̊надах:дождливый
бору̊ндах:дождливый
борӣк:тонкий
борӣнҷ:весенний
босāwод:грамотный
босаwод:грамотный
ботил:бесполезный
боқиму̊ндā:остальной
боҷадор:имеющий_свояка
бу́қаθ:выпуклый
бу́қаθ:низкорослый
бу̊йеҷ:для_благовония
бу̊ндор:бородатый
бу̊нин:бородатый
бу̊нин:взрослый
бу̊х̌:сердитый
бу̊х̌-δāδӣҷ:скандальный
бу̊х̌-зан:придирчивый
бу̊қā:дородный
бу̊қā-бу̊қā:взрослые
бу̊қā-бу̊қā:знаменитые
будалло:способный
будало:способный
буж-бужак:вялый
буздил:боязливый
бузург:великий
бузург:старший
букул:взрослый
булаwас:непостоянный
булдоқ:холостой
булғуч:комкообразный
булҳаwас:непостоянный
бун-зийух̌ч:с_засохшим_корнем
бунā:состоятельный
бунйоди:непоколебимый
бунйоти:непоколебимый
бунху̊ндор:зажиточный
бунҷойаки:местный
бунҷоки:местный
буори:весенний
буорну̊нҷ:весенний
буорӣнҷ:весенний
бурах̌дор:хорошо_режущий
буриндā:режущий
буф:слабый
бухтоқ:рослый
буц-баладор:семейный
буцди:меньший
буцди:младший
буцдор:имеющий_детей
буцик:маленький
буцики:детский
буцикик:маленький
буч-бу̊стин:из_козлиной_шкуры
буғз:злобный
буғуз:стельная
буғӡ:злобный
буқ:выпуклый
буқ:крупный
буқ:невысокий
буқ-ну̊л:с_загнутым_клювом
буқā:дородный
буқā:огромный
буқи:проклятый
буққā:дородный
буққā:огромный
бӣ:лучший
бӣдарди:лучший
бӣди:лучший
бӣди:лучше
бӣдиди:лучший
бӣно:зрячий
бӣнойи:хороший
бӣр:нижний
бӣрненҷ:нижний
бӣрненҷ:нижний
бӣрнинҷ:нижний
бӣрнӣнҷ:нижний
бӣрӣн:нижний
бӣрӣн:нижний
бӯйдоқ:холостой
бӯқи:проклятый
вêɣ̌ӡнин:березовый
вазанд:козлиный
вайен:военный
вайени:военный
ваҷ:наружная
вегайӣнҷ:вчерашний
вегану̊нҷ:вчерашний
веганӣнҷ:вчерашний
вегӣнҷ:вчерашний
векор:свободный
векорā:не_занятый_делом
визнеч:козий
визнечанд:козлиный
виндӣҷ:завязывающий
виноwҷин:не_проявляющий_желания
вираwин:бровастый
вирах̌чин:ломаный
вирех̌уми:шелковый
вирех̌умин:шелковый
вирех̌умин:шелковый
вирех̌умин:шелковый
вирих̌цин:ломаный
виродинги:братский
виру̊ɣ̌ин:бровастый
вирух̌чин:ломаный
вирх̌ин:волосяной
во:вторичное
воɣ̌ȥ:длинный
воɣ̌ӡ:длинный
воɣ̌ӡ-бӣц:длиннолицый
воɣ̌ӡ-рāнг:продолговатый
возāкдор:имеющий_межу
ворҷан:конский
ворҷанд:конский
ву̊р:бурый
ву̊р:бурый
ву̊р-ҷāw:буроватый
ву̊р-ҷāɣ̌:буроватый
ву̊р-ҷуw:буроватый
ву̊р-ҷӯɣ̌:буроватый
вӣн:созревший
вӣндӣҷ:завязывающий
вӣндӣҷ:завязывающий
вӣр:урожайный
вӣши:лучший
вӯɣ̌ȥ:длинный
вӯɣ̌ӡ:длинный
вӯɣ̌ӡ-бӣц:длиннолицый
вӯɣ̌ӡ-ранг:продолговатый
гāпду̊н:красноречивый
гāрм:теплый
гāч-δоδҷин:побеленный
гāчин:меловой
габардӣн:габардиновый
гадо:нищий
галwезу̊н:висящий
галwеӡу̊н:висящий
галу̊:глупый
ганд:непонятливый
ганд:тупой
гандā:плохой
гандā:скупой
гандā:дурной
ганда-бу̊й:вонючий
ганда-бу̊й:вонючий
ганда-фêл:норовистый
ганда-фêл:норовистый
гандаҷин:уродливый
гапду̊н:красноречивый
гаранг:обалделый
гарм:теплый
гарм-рӯй:скромный
гах̌-чи-гарδӯн:зигзагообразный
гах̌т-чи-гарδӯн:зигзагообразный
гербдор:гербовый
гигез-по:бегающий
гигез-поδ:бегающий
гилwезу̊н:висящий
гилгӯн:яркокрасный
гилгӯн:яркий
гилгӯн-пӯх̌:одетый_в_яркое
гилгӯнд:яркокрасный
гилемин:суконный
гилӣмин:суконный
гирд:круглый
гирифтā:скупой
гирифтор:схваченный
гируснā:голодный
гич:мокрый
гиҷанд:козий
гоw-амбу̊н:толстый
гоw-тӯри:боязливый
гоwи:жирный
гу́ли-мели́с:нежный
гу̊л:немой
гу̊л:онемелый
гу̊л:слабоумный
гу̊ртареҷ:ненужный
гу̊рҷоки:отвратительный
гулакин-бӣц:с_лицом
гулакин-бӣц:с_лицом
гулдор:разукрашенный
гулдӯзи:вышитый
гулнêх:белолобый
гулнêх:белолобый
гулнāх:белолобый
гулнāх:белолобый
гунд:тупой
гунд:тупой
гунд:непонятливый
гунд:тупой
гунд-рāнг:туповатый
гурез-по:бегающий
гурез-поδ:бегающий
гуроз:огромный
гуруснā:голодный
гух̌нā:голодный
гух̌нā:голодный
гух̌на-чашм:жадный
гуҷанд:козий
гӣр:закрепленный
гӣр:занятый
гӣр:ожидающий
гӣр:занятой
гӯна-гӯнā:различный
гӯх̌акдор:с_колками
гӯх̌тин:мясистый
гӯх̌тин:мясной
дê-бадараw:временный
дāм-ғу̊т:молчаливый
дāрδдор:болезненный
дāрδдор:болезненный
дāрδиманд:болезненный
дāрδманд:болезненный
дāшат-δāδӣҷ:приводящий_в_ужас
дāшат-зан:приводящий_в_ужас
даwак:резвый
даwанд:быстроногий
даwанд:быстроходный
даwлатдор:богатый
даwлати:государственный
даwлати:государственный
даwлатманд:богатый
даwо:целебный
даwӯс:двуличный
дабол:проклятый
дабол:опухший
даболи:проклятый
дайн:доказанный
дайӯс:двуличный
далбā́қ:скитающийся
далбā́қ-аθ:скитающийся
далер:отважный
далсӯз:жалостливый
дам-ғу̊т:молчаливый
дамдамā:полныйпреполный
даму̊мā:пухлый
данг:простой
дар:далекий
дар-парδā:закрытый
дар-қāр:в_гневе
дар-қāр:в_гневе
дарwêзи:дарвазский
дарwози:дарвазский
дарδиманд:болезненный
дарδманд:болезненный
дарво:нужный
дарвоги:нужный
дарвойи:нужный
даргӣл:горестный
дарйо:щедрый
даркор:нужный
даркор:нужный
даркори:нужный
дарморахти:дарморахтский
дарму̊нтā:разоренный
